Wyoming, session 2025, HB0324.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 9-1-104 is created to read:

9-1-104. Employees of state officials; at-will
employment; rules applicability.

HB0324

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0445
(a) As used in this section, "state official" means
the secretary of state, the state auditor, the state
treasurer and the superintendent of public instruction.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the
following shall apply to each employee of each state
official:

(i) Each employee shall be an at-will employee;

(ii) Each employee is hired by the applicable
state official and serve at the pleasure of the state
official;

(iii) The employing state official retains the
absolute right to terminate any employee of the state
official at any time, with or without cause, except for a
cause that violates applicable federal or state law;

(iv) Employees of state officials are subject
only to the policies, manuals, rules and statutory
provisions governing employees of the state official.
Employees of state officials are specifically exempt from
HB0324

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0445
the laws and personnel rules relating to employees of the
executive branch, including the executive branch
compensation plan, job classifications and personnel rules
governing employee discipline, grievances and appeals.
Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to supersede a
statute that expressly prescribes the employment conditions
and salaries of specified employees of state officials.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to:

(i) Alter or impair any employment contract
entered into before July 1, 2025;

(ii) Make any employee of an state official an
at-will employment contract employee, unless a contract or
agreement expressly provides that the employee is hired for
an at-will employment contract position.

Section 2. Nothing in this act shall be construed to
alter, amend or impair any agreement or contract entered
into before July 1, 2025.

HB0324

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0445
Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0324